Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.060

Issuance of writ—Notice—Hearing—Issuance without prior notice—Forms for notice.

(1) When application is made for a prejudgment writ of garnishment, the court shall issue the writ in substantially the form prescribed in RCW 6.27.070 and 6.27.100 directing that the garnishee withhold an amount as prescribed in RCW 6.27.090, but, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the court shall issue the writ only after prior notice to the defendant, given in the manner prescribed in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, with an opportunity for a prior hearing at which the plaintiff shall establish the probable validity of the plaintiff's claim and that there is probable cause to believe that the alleged ground for garnishment exists.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the court shall issue the writ without prior notice to the defendant and without an opportunity for a prior hearing only if:

(a) A ground alleged in the plaintiff's affidavit is: (i) A ground appearing in RCW 6.26.010(2)(c) if the writ is to be directed to an employer for the purpose of garnishing the defendant's earnings; or (ii) a ground appearing in RCW 6.25.030 (5) through (7) or in RCW 6.25.040(1) of the attachment chapter; or (iii) if garnishment is necessary to permit the court to acquire jurisdiction over the action, the ground alleged is one appearing in RCW 6.25.030 (1) through (4) or in RCW 6.26.010(2) (a) or (b); and

(b) The court finds on the basis of specific facts, after an ex parte hearing, that there is probable cause to believe the allegations of the plaintiff's affidavit.

(3) If a writ is issued under subsection (2) of this section without prior notice to the defendant, after service of the writ on the garnishee, the defendant shall be entitled to prompt notice of the garnishment and a right to an early hearing, if requested, at which the plaintiff shall establish the probable validity of the claim sued on and that there is probable cause to believe that the alleged ground for garnishment exists.

(4) When notice and a hearing are required under this section, notice may be given by a show cause order stating the date, time, and place of the hearing. Notice required under this section shall be jurisdictional and, except as provided for published notice in subsection (5) of this section, notice required under this section shall be served in the same manner as a summons in a civil action and shall be served together with (a) a copy of plaintiff's affidavit and a copy of the writ if already issued, and (b) a copy of the following "Notice of Right to a Hearing" in substantially the following form or, if defendant is an individual, a copy of the claim form and the "Notice of Garnishment and of Your Rights" prescribed by RCW 6.27.140, in which the following notice is substituted for the first paragraph of said Notice:

NOTICE OF RIGHT TO HEARING

A writ of garnishment has been or will be issued by a Washington court and has been or will be served on the garnishee defendant. It will require the garnishee defendant to withhold payment of money that may be due to you and to withhold other property of yours that the garnishee may hold or control until a lawsuit in which you are a defendant has been decided by the court. Service of this notice of your rights is required by law.

YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO A PROMPT HEARING. If notice of a hearing date and time is not served with this notice, you have the right to request the hearing. At the hearing, the plaintiff must give evidence that there is probable cause to believe that the statements in the enclosed affidavit are true and also that the claim stated in the lawsuit is probably valid, or else the garnishment will be released.

(5) If service of notice on the defendant must be effected by publication, only the following notice need be published under the caption of the case:

To, Defendant:

A writ of prejudgment garnishment has been issued in the above captioned case, directed to . . . . . . as Garnishee Defendant, commanding the Garnishee to withhold amounts due you or to withhold any of your property in the Garnishee's possession or control for application to any judgment that may be entered for plaintiff in the case.

YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO ASK FOR A HEARING. At the hearing, the plaintiff must give evidence that there is probable cause to believe that the ground for garnishment alleged in an affidavit filed with the court exists and also that the claim stated in the lawsuit is probably valid, or else the garnishment will be released.

If the defendant is an individual, the following paragraph shall be added to the published notice:

YOU MAY ALSO HAVE A RIGHT TO HAVE THE GARNISHMENT RELEASED if amounts or property withheld are exempt under federal or state statutes, for example, bank accounts in which benefits such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Social Security, United States pension, Unemployment Compensation, or Veterans' benefits have been deposited or certain personal property described in section 6.15.010 of the Revised Code of Washington.

[ 1997 c 59 s 1; 1988 c 231 s 20; 1987 c 442 s 906.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.